Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,187
Board member; compensation; expenses.

Each board member shall be paid the sum of fifty dollars per day while actually engaged in the business of the board. The members of the board shall be paid their mileage and expenses in attending meetings of the board and carrying out their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1988, LB 863, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-742;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 23.